District of Columbia statutes.
38-2323

Repealed

Agreement with Gallaudet College; annual report.

Repealed.

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 1027, Pub. L. 89-694, § 4
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1823.
1973 Ed., § 31-1053.